New York, session 2025-2026, S10379.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 155-a of the executive law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. "Office" shall mean the office of fire prevention and control. 4 § 2. Subdivision 18 of section 156 of the executive law, as added by 5 chapter 543 of the laws of 1983 and as renumbered by chapter 615 of the 6 laws of 2006, is amended to read as follows: 7 18. Establish rules and regulations as to the location and design of a 8 delineator used to mark the location of fire hydrants. Such rules and 9 regulations shall include, but not be limited to: 10 (a) establishing a state database of every fire hydrant latitude and 11 longitude coordinates with centimeter precision for each fire hydrant 12 that can be exported as a CSV file to be used with GPS location services 13 as a map overlay; 14 (b) requiring every municipal corporation or private entity to provide 15 the coordinates required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision 16 for every fire hydrant under its control to the office and provide any 17 updates to the office within one hundred eighty days of every installa- 18 tion and maintenance cycle; and 19 (c) creating a CSV spreadsheet file that is compatible for use with 20 Google maps to create an overlay onto Google maps in order to provide 21 the exact location of fire hydrants. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 23 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13574-01-5